test/src/morphology/N-alomanw19_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - alomanõ: # Noun (19) alomanõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Nom: alomanõ
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Gen: alomadsõ
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Par: alomast
     alomanõ+N+Sg+Ill: alomastõ
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Gen: [alomaidsi, alomastõ]
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Par: alomaidsi
     alomanõ+N+Pl+Ill: alomaidsihe
     alomanõ+N+Pl+All: [alomaidsilõ, alomastõlõ]
